Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Administrator” has the meaning given that term in ORS 342.120.
(b) “Practice of nursing” has the meaning given that term in ORS 678.010.
(c) “School nurse” has the meaning given that term in ORS 342.455.
(2) A school nurse, or a registered nurse whose  responsibilities include the coordination
of school nursing services provided to individual students pursuant to ORS 336.201,  shall co-
ordinate school nursing services to ensure care for individual students  in a school to the
extent that the care is within the practice of nursing.
(3)(a) An administrator or other staff member who is  not a nurse may supervise, evalu-
ate or direct a school nurse or  registered nurse described in subsection (2) of this section
for purposes related to the nurse’s role as a school  employee, including but not limited to
assigning the nurse’s work hours, locations and workload and  other matters addressed
through a collective bargaining agreement.
(b) An  administrator or other staff member may not direct the school nurse or regis-
tered nurse in the practice of nursing.
(4) Nothing in this section:
(a) Requires a school nurse or registered nurse  to be clinically supervised in a school
setting;
(b) Requires a school district that employs a school nurse or registered  nurse to provide
a clinical supervisor for the nurse; or
(c) Prohibits another nurse, or an administrator or other  staff member who is not a
nurse, from conferring  with the school nurse or registered nurse with respect to the practice
of nursing or issues related to student safety.
Enrolled House Bill 2948 (HB 2948-A) Page 1
Passed by House March 10, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 20, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2948 (HB 2948-A) Page 2